sv: Skidkonstruktion: Täckt; Hybridlock; Partiellt lock; Sidovägg; Övrigt
th: โครงสร้างของสกี: แคปโท; Hybrid Cap; Partial Cap; Sidewall; อื่นๆ
ja: スキー構造: キャップ; ハイブリッドキャップ; パーシャルキャップ; サイドウォール; その他
de: Skikonstruktion: Deckel; Hybridkappe; Teilkappe; Seitenwand; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Estrutura do esqui: Oxford; Cap híbrido; Cap parcial; Sidewall; Outro
zh-TW: 滑雪板結構: 帽子; 混合蓋; 局部蓋; 側壁; 其他
hu: Síléc felépítése: Sapka; Hibrid sapka; Részleges sapka; Oldalfal; Egyéb
lt-LT: Slidžių konstrukcija: Padengimas; Hibridinis padengimas; Dalinis padengimas; Šoninė sienelė; Kita
tr: Kayak yapımı: Kap; Hibrit kapak; Kısmi kapak; Yan duvar; Diğer
nb: Skikonstruksjon: Lokk; Hybridhette; Delvis hette; Sidevegg; Annet
da: Skikonstruktion: Kappe; Hybridhætte; Delvis hætte; Sidewall; Andet
es: Construcción del esquí: Gorra; Tapa híbrida; Tapa parcial; Pared lateral; Otros
cs: Konstrukce lyží: S kšiltem; Hybridní jádro; Částečné jádro; Bočnice; Jiné
ru: Конструкция лыж: Кэп; Гибридный кэп; Частичный кэп; Сайдвол; Другое
hr-HR: Konstrukcija skija: Cap; Hibridni cap; Djelomični kap; Strana; Ostalo
fi: Suksien rakenne: Peite; Hybridi; Osittainen; Sivuseinä; Muu
sl-SI: Konstrukcija smuči: Oplaščena; Hibridna oplaščena; Delno oplaščena; Sidewall; Drugo
zh-CN: 滑雪板结构: 包头鞋; 混合帽式; 半帽式; 侧壁; 其他
en: Ski construction: Cap; Hybrid cap; Partial cap; Sidewall; Other
el: Κατασκευή σκι: Καπάκι; Υβριδικό καπάκι; Partial Capos; Πλευρικό τοίχωμα; Άλλο
fr: Fabrication du ski: Rond; À capuchon hybride; À capuchon partiel; Paroi latérale; Autre
sk-SK: Konštrukcia lyží: Cap; Hybridná cap; Čiastočný cap; Sidewall; Iné
it: Costruzione di sci: Punta tonda; Tappo ibrido; Tappo parziale; Parete laterale; Altro
pl: Konstrukcja nart: Cap; Hybrydowe cap; Częściowe cap; Z bocznymi ściankami; Inne
nl: Skiconstructie: Kap; Hybride kap; Gedeeltelijke kap; Zijwand; Andere
ro-RO: Construcția schiurilor: Cap; Hybrid cap; Partial cap; Sidewall; Altele
pt-PT: Construção de ski: Biqueira; Boné híbrido; Boné parcial; Parede lateral; Outro
ko: 스키 구성: 캡; 하이브리드 캡; 부분 캡; 사이드월; 기타
bg-BG: Конструкция на ски: Покритие; Хибридно покритие; Частично покритие; Странична стена; Други
vi: Xây dựng ván trượt tuyết: Mũi giày có đường chỉ cắt ngang qua; Nắp kết hợp; Nắp một phần; Vỉa hè; Khác